Washington statutes.
RCW 19.158.030

Violation an unfair or deceptive act.

Unfair and deceptive telephone solicitation is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. A violation of this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1989 c 20 s 2.]